Nebraska, session 109, LB255.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB255 LB255
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 24-1302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
24-1302 (1) For purposes of this section, problem solving court
means a drug, veterans, mental health, driving under the influence,
reentry, young adult, or other problem solving court.
(2) A district, county, or juvenile court may establish a problem
solving court, subject to the Supreme Court's rules. A problem solving
court shall function within the existing structure of the court system.
The goals of a problem solving court shall be consistent with any
relevant standards adopted by the United States Department of Justice and
the National Association of Drug Court Professionals, as such standards
existed on January 1, 2023.
(3) An individual may participate in a problem solving court as a
condition of probation, as a sentence imposed by a court, or as otherwise
provided by the Supreme Court's rules.
(4) Problem solving courts shall be subject to rules which shall be
promulgated by the Supreme Court for procedures to be implemented in the
administration of such courts.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds be appropriated
separately to the Supreme Court such that each judicial district may
operate at least one drug, veterans, mental health, driving under the
influence, reentry, and young adult problem solving court. The State
Court Administrator shall ensure that each judicial district has at least
one of such courts by January 1, 2024.
(6) The State Court Administrator shall track and evaluate outcomes
of problem solving courts. On or before June 1, 2024, and on or before
each June 1 thereafter, the State Court Administrator shall
electronically submit a report to the Legislature regarding the impact of
problem solving courts on recidivism rates in the state. The report shall
also include rates of return to court and program completion. The report
shall identify judicial districts that are underserved by problem solving
-2-

LB255 LB255
2025 2025
courts and what services or funding are needed to properly serve such
districts.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate money from
the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund to the Supreme Court for
problem solving courts to order medication-assisted treatment that
involves the use of medication approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration, in combination with counseling and behavioral health
therapies, for the treatment of substance use disorders.
Sec. 2. Section 71-2492, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-2492 (1) The Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund is
created. The fund shall consist of transfers from the Nebraska Opioid
Recovery Trust Fund.
(2) Money from the fund may be appropriated to the Supreme Court for
use in problem solving courts to order medication-assisted treatment that
involves the use of medication approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration, in combination with counseling and behavioral health
therapies, for the treatment of substance use disorders as provided in
section 24-1302.
(3) (2) The division shall use the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure
Cash Fund as appropriated by the Legislature for local and state public-
private partnerships for nonprofit and for-profit entities engaged in
opioid use prevention and opioid treatment infrastructure projects as
determined by the division, including capital construction and
renovation. The administrative cost for distributing funds under this
subsection section shall not exceed an amount equal to five percent of
the amount distributed.
(4) (3) Any money in the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
-3-

LB255 LB255
2025 2025
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million
dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 and one million dollars for fiscal year
2026-27 from the Opioid Treatment Infrastructure Cash Fund to the Supreme
Court for medication-assisted treatment as provided in section 24-1302.
Sec. 3. Original sections 24-1302 and 71-2492, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-